Maine, session 132, LD451.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA c. 44-A is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 44-A
PERFLUOROALKYL AND POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES TESTING
FOR SOLAR AND WIND ENERGY DEVELOPMENTS
§4421. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Department. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection.
2. Operator. "Operator" means the person operating a solar energy development or
wind energy development.
3. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. "Perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" has the same meaning as in Title 38, section 1614,
subsection 1, paragraph F.
4. Solar energy development. "Solar energy development" means a development
that uses a solar energy system to convert solar energy to electrical energy for sale or use
by a person other than the generator. "Solar energy development" includes generating
facilities and associated facilities.
5. Wind energy development. "Wind energy development" has the same meaning as
in section 3451, subsection 11.
§4422. PFAS contamination testing requirements; rules
In accordance with rules adopted by the department, the operator of a solar energy
development or a wind energy development shall conduct testing for PFAS contamination
at the development site. Rules adopted by the department pursuant to this section are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A and must include,
but are not limited to, the following provisions:
1. Scope. Requirements regarding the scope of testing to be conducted by the operator,
including sampling and testing methods. The rules must require such testing to be
conducted prior to development of a solar energy development or wind energy
development, again after one year of operation of the development and every 5 years
thereafter;
2. Third-party analysis. Requirements for the operator to contract for a 3rd-party
analysis of any PFAS contamination discovered through testing to assess whether the
development is the source of the contamination;
3. Documentation. Requirements regarding documentation of testing and submission
by the operator of testing results, the 3rd-party analysis if applicable and other information
to the department; and
Page 1 - 132LR0444(01)

4. Evaluation. Provisions outlining the process by which the department will evaluate
any PFAS contamination discovered through testing at the development site. The rules
must require that, based on submitted testing and analysis and any other information
available to the department, the department issue a written determination as to whether the
PFAS contamination was reasonably caused by the construction, operation or components
of the development. The department shall provide a copy of the determination to the
operator of the development and to the commission and post a copy of the determination
on the department's publicly accessible website.
The costs of remediation of any PFAS contamination discovered through testing at the
development site is the responsibility of the owner or operator of the development.
The department shall administer and enforce testing requirements adopted by rule
pursuant to this section subject to the same powers and authorities granted to it pursuant to
Title 38, chapter 2.
§4423. Effect of determination; commission notification
Notwithstanding any provision of this Title or commission rule to the contrary, if the
department determines in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section 4422 that
PFAS contamination discovered at the site of a solar energy development or wind energy
development was reasonably caused by the construction, operation or components of the
development, the development no longer meets the eligibility requirements:
1. Renewable resource. As a renewable resource or renewable capacity resource for
the purposes of section 3210 and for any procurement or other contracting conducted in
accordance with chapter 32; and
2. Net energy billing; distributed generation resource. For participation in net
energy billing under section 3209-A or 3209-B and no longer meets the eligibility
requirements as a distributed generation resource for the purposes of section 3209-D.
If the commission receives from the department a written determination that PFAS
contamination discovered at the site of a solar energy development or wind energy
development was reasonably caused by the construction, operation or components of the
development, the commission shall notify all competitive electricity providers and
transmission and distribution utilities regarding the effect of that determination as set forth
in this section.